District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.124

Carrying on business after issuance of proclamation.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 231, ch. 269, § 124
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 441(b), 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 25, 38 DCR 314
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.124.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.25.
1973 Ed., § 29-938a.